California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(b) If a taxpayer is required by subdivision (b) of Section 18622 to file an amended return and does file the return within six months of filing an amended return with the Commissioner of Internal Revenue, a notice of proposed deficiency assessment in excess of the self-assessed tax on the amended return, and resulting from the adjustments may be mailed to the taxpayer within two years from the date when the amended return is filed with the Franchise Tax Board by the taxpayer, or within the periods provided in Section 19057, 19058, or 19065, whichever period expires later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 71.   Effective October 10, 1999.   Applicable, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 987, to federal determinations that become final on or after January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

19060.

(a) If a taxpayer fails to report a change or correction by the Commissioner of Internal Revenue or other officer of the United States or other competent authority or fails to file an amended return as required by Section 18622, a notice of proposed deficiency assessment resulting from the adjustment may be mailed to the taxpayer at any time.

(b) If, after the six-month period required in Section
 18622, a taxpayer or the Internal Revenue Service reports a change or correction by the Commissioner of Internal Revenue or other officer of the United States or other competent authority or files an amended return as required by Section 18622, a notice of proposed deficiency assessment resulting from the adjustment may be mailed to the taxpayer within four years from the date the taxpayer or the Internal Revenue Service notifies the Franchise Tax Board of that change or correction or files that return.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 72.   Effective October 10, 1999.   Applicable, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 987, to federal determinations that become final on or after January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

19061.

In case of a deficiency described in Sections 24945 and 24946, and in Sections 1033(a)(2)(C) and 1033(a)(2)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, the deficiency may be assessed at any time prior to the expiration of the time therein provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19063.

(a) In the case of any tax imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) with respect to any person, the period for assessing a deficiency attributable to any partnership item of a federally registered partnership shall not expire before the later of the following:

(1) The date which is five years after the date on which the partnership return of the federally registered partnership for the
 partnership taxable year in which the item arose was filed (or later, if the date prescribed for filing the return).

(2) If the name or address of the person does not appear on the partnership return, the date which is one year after the date on which the information is furnished to the Franchise Tax Board in the manner and at the place as it may prescribe.

(b) For purposes of this section, “partnership item” means both of the following:

(1) Any item required to be taken into account for the partnership taxable year under any provision of subchapter K of Chapter 1 of Title 26 of the Internal Revenue Code to the extent that regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board provide that for purposes of this part that item is more appropriately determined at the partnership level than at the partner level.

(2) Any other item to the extent affected by an item described in paragraph (1).

(c) The extensions referred to in subsection (c)(4) of Section 6501 of the Internal Revenue Code, insofar as they relate to partnership items, may, with respect to any person, be consented by either of the following:

(1) Except to the extent the Franchise Tax Board is otherwise notified by the partnership, by a general partner of the partnership.

(2) By any person authorized to do so by the partnership in writing.

(d) For purposes of this section, “federally registered partnership” means, with respect to any partnership taxable year, any partnership for which either of the following apply:

(1) Interests have been offered for sale at any time during that taxable year or a prior taxable year in any offering required to be registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission.

(2) At any time during that taxable year or a prior taxable year, was subject to the annual reporting requirements of the Securities and Exchange Commission which relate to the protection of investors in the partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19064.

(a) If any person initiates a motion to quash a subpoena, as provided by Sections 7465 to 7476, inclusive, of the Government Code, and that person is the person with respect to whose liability the subpoena is issued (or is the agent, nominee, or other person acting under the direction or control of that person), then the running of any period of limitations under Section 19057 (relating to deficiency assessments), Section 19087 (relating to false or fraudulent returns), or Section 19704 (relating to criminal prosecutions) with respect
 to that person shall be suspended for the period during which a proceeding, and appeals therein, with respect to the enforcement of the subpoena is pending.

(b) In the absence of the resolution of the subpoenaed person’s response to a subpoena issued under Section 19504 (power of examination), the running of any period of limitations under Section 19057 (relating to deficiency assessments), Section 19087 (relating to false or fraudulent returns), or Section 19704 (relating to criminal prosecutions) with respect to any person whose liability the subpoena was issued (other than a person taking action as provided by subdivision (a)) shall be suspended for the period beginning on the date which is six months after the service of the subpoena and ending with the final resolution of that response.

(c) The amendments made by the act adding this subdivision are operative for any subpoena
 served after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 931, Sec. 14.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19065.

If any taxpayer agrees with the United States Commissioner of Internal Revenue for an extension or renewals thereof of the period for proposing and assessing deficiencies in federal income taxes for any year, the period for mailing a notice of a proposed deficiency shall be four years after the return was filed or six months after the date of the expiration of the agreed period for assessing deficiencies in the federal income tax, whichever period expires the later.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19066.

(a) For the purposes of Sections 19057, 19058, and 19065, a return of tax imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) except a return required by Article 5 (commencing with Section 18661) of Chapter 2 (relating to withholding), filed before the last day prescribed by law for filing (determined without regard to any extension of time for filing the return), shall be considered as filed on that day. For purposes of Section 19306, payment of any portion of the
 tax made before the last day prescribed for the payment of the tax shall be considered made on the last day.

(b) For purposes of this section, if a return required by Article 5 (commencing with Section 18661) of Chapter 2 (relating to withholding) or a return of tax imposed by Section 13020 of the Unemployment Insurance Code (relating to withholding tax on wages), for any period ending with or within a calendar year is filed before April 15 of the succeeding calendar year, that return shall be considered filed on April 15 of that calendar year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19066.5.

In the case of any information that is required to be reported to the Franchise Tax Board under Section 19141.2 or 19141.5, the time for assessment of any tax imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part with respect to any event or period to which that information relates shall not expire before the date that is four years after the date on which the Franchise Tax Board is furnished the information required to be reported under Section 19141.2 or 19141.5, or within the periods provided in Section
 19057, 19058, 19059, 19060, 19065, 24945, 24946, Section 1033(a)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, or Section 1033(a)(2)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, whichever period expires later.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 322, Sec. 49.   Effective August 20, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19067.

(a) Where before the expiration of the time prescribed for the mailing of a notice of a proposed deficiency assessment, the taxpayer consents in writing to an assessment after that time, the assessment may be made at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The period agreed upon may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the taxpayer of the
 taxpayer’s right to refuse to extend the expiration of the time prescribed for the mailing of a notice of a proposed deficiency assessment, or to limit that extension to a particular period of time, on each occasion when the taxpayer is requested to provide the taxpayer’s consent.

(c) The amendments made by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to any request to extend the expiration of the time prescribed for the mailing of a notice of a proposed deficiency assessment made after December 31, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 931, Sec. 15.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Assessments against Persons Secondarily Liable [19071. - 19074.]

19071.

The taxes imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) upon any taxpayer other than a transferee for which any person other than the taxpayer is liable may be assessed against that person in the manner provided for the assessment of deficiencies. The taxes may be assessed at any time within which deficiency assessments may be made against the taxpayer; provided, however, the running of the period of limitations upon the assessment of the liability imposed upon any person other than the
 taxpayer shall, after the mailing of the notice provided for in Section 19033 to the taxpayer, be suspended for the period during which the taxpayer exercises an administrative remedy as provided in Section 19041, 19045, or 19048.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19072.

The provisions of this part respecting the collection of taxes apply to the collection of the taxes from the person secondarily liable to the same extent and with the same force and effect as though that person were the taxpayer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19073.

The amounts of the following liabilities, except as hereinafter provided in this section and Section 19074, shall be assessed, collected, and paid in the same manner and subject to the same provisions and limitations as in the case of a deficiency (including the provisions in the case of a delinquency in payment after notice and demand, the provisions authorizing proceedings in court for collection, and the provisions prohibiting claims and suits for refunds):

(a) The
 liability, at law or in equity, of a transferee of property of a taxpayer, in respect of the tax (including interest, additional amounts, and additions to the tax provided by law) imposed upon the taxpayer.

(b) The liability of a fiduciary under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) in respect of the payment of any such tax from the estate of the taxpayer.

Any such liability may be either as to the amount of tax shown on the return or as to any deficiency in tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19074.

The period of limitation for assessment of the liability of any person other than the taxpayer who is a transferee or fiduciary of the taxpayer shall be as follows:

(a) In the case of the liability of an initial transferee of the property of the taxpayer, within one year after the expiration of the period of limitation for assessment against the taxpayer.

(b) In the case of the liability of a transferee of
 a transferee of the property of the taxpayer, within one year after the expiration of the period of limitation for assessment against the preceding transferee, but only if within three years after the expiration of the period of limitation for assessment against the taxpayer; except that if before the expiration of the period of limitation for the assessment of the liability of the transferee of a transferee, a court proceeding for the collection of the tax or liability in respect thereof has been begun against the taxpayer or last preceding transferee, respectively, then the period of limitation for assessment of the liability of the transferee of a transferee shall expire one year after the return of execution in the court proceeding.

(c) In the case of the liability of a fiduciary, not later than one year after the liability arises or not later than the expiration of the period for collection of the tax in respect of which the liability
 arises, whichever is the later;

(d) Where before the expiration of the time prescribed in subdivision (a), (b) or (c) for the assessment of the liability, both the Franchise Tax Board and the transferee or fiduciary have consented in writing to its assessment after that time, the liability may be assessed at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The period so agreed upon may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon.

(e) Notwithstanding any of the above subdivisions, the running of the period of limitations upon the assessment of liability against any transferee shall be suspended for the period during which the taxpayer exercises an administrative remedy as provided in Section 19041, 19045, or 19048.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Jeopardy Assessments [19081. - 19093.]

19081.

If the Franchise Tax Board finds that the assessment or the collection of a tax or a deficiency for any year, current or past, will be jeopardized in whole or in part by delay, it may mail or issue notice of its findings to the taxpayer, or its transferee or transferees, together with a demand for immediate payment of the tax or the deficiency declared to be in jeopardy, including interest and penalties and additions thereto. Any assessment issued under this article shall also be an assessment issued pursuant to Section 19033, if an assessment has not
 already been issued pursuant to Section 19033 with respect to that taxable year for that amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19082.

In the case of a tax for a current period, if the Franchise Tax Board finds that the assessment or collection of the tax will be jeopardized in whole or in part by delay, the Franchise Tax Board may declare the taxable period of the taxpayer immediately terminated. The Franchise Tax Board shall mail or issue notice of its finding and declaration to the taxpayer, together with a demand for a return and immediate payment of the tax based on the period declared terminated, including therein income accrued and deductions incurred up to the date of termination if
 not otherwise properly includible or deductible in respect of the period, and the tax shall be immediately due and payable whether or not the time otherwise allowed by law for filing the return and paying the tax has expired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19083.

(a) A jeopardy assessment is immediately due and payable, and proceedings for collection may be commenced at once.

(b) The collection of the whole or any amount of a jeopardy assessment may be stayed, at any time before the assessment becomes final, by filing with the Franchise Tax Board: (1) a bond in an amount equal to the amount (together with interest thereon to the date of payment) as to which the stay is desired, conditioned upon the payment
 of the amount, the collection of which is stayed by the bond, upon notice and demand by the Franchise Tax Board after the assessment becomes final; or (2) other security in the amount as the Franchise Tax Board may deem necessary, not exceeding double the amount (together with interest thereon to the date of payment) as to which the stay is desired.

(c) Upon the filing of the bond or other security the collection of so much of the amount assessed as is covered by the bond or other security shall be stayed. The taxpayer shall have the right to waive the stay at any time in respect of the whole or any part of the amount covered by the bond or other security, and if as a result of the waiver any part of the amount covered by the bond or other security is paid, then the bond or other security shall, at the request of the taxpayer, be proportionately reduced. If any portion of the jeopardy assessment is abated, the bond or other security shall, at
 the request of the taxpayer, be proportionately reduced.

(d) The Franchise Tax Board, prior to the time the assessment becomes final, may stay collection of the whole or any amount of a jeopardy assessment if it finds that jeopardy does not exist.

(e) Where collection of the whole or any amount of a jeopardy assessment has been stayed under this section, the period of limitation on any action to collect shall be tolled during the time of the stay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19084.

(a) (1) (A) Unless the Chief Counsel of the Franchise Tax Board (or the chief counsel’s delegate) personally approves (in writing) the assessment or levy, no assessment shall be made under this article and no levy shall be issued less than 30 days after either of the following:

(i) A notice and demand is mailed or issued for payment pursuant to Section 19081.

(ii) Notice and demand for a return and payment is mailed or issued pursuant to Section 19082.

(B) Within five days after the day on which either a notice and demand for payment is mailed or issued pursuant to Section 19081, or notice and demand for a return and payment is mailed or issued pursuant to Section 19082, the Franchise Tax Board shall mail or issue the taxpayer a written statement of the information upon which the Franchise Tax Board relies in issuing that notice and demand.

(2) Within 30 days after the day on which the taxpayer is furnished the written statement described in paragraph (1), or within 30 days after the last day of the period within which the statement is required to be furnished, the taxpayer may petition the Franchise Tax Board to review whether its finding pursuant to Section 19081 or 19082 is reasonable under the circumstances, specifying
 the grounds on which the petition is based. The filing of a petition for review shall not operate to stay collection. Collection may be stayed only as provided in Section 19083. A petition filed pursuant to this paragraph shall also be considered a protest filed pursuant to Section 19041 against the proposed additional tax.

(3) If a petition for review under paragraph (2) is not made within the 30-day period set forth in that paragraph, the finding of the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to Section 19081 or 19082 is final.

(4) After a petition for review is filed under paragraph (2), the Franchise Tax Board shall determine whether or not the issuance of notice and demand under Section 19081 or 19082 is reasonable under the circumstances. In making this determination, the Franchise Tax Board shall grant the taxpayer or authorized representative an oral hearing if the taxpayer has so
 requested in the petition. Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to a hearing under this paragraph. The burden of proof with respect to whether a jeopardy exists as to collection or an assessment is upon the Franchise Tax Board.

(5) The Franchise Tax Board shall make the determination under paragraph (4) within 90 days of the filing of the petition for review unless the taxpayer requests, in writing, additional time.

(6) In making the determination required by paragraph (4), the Franchise Tax Board shall consider all relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the likelihood that collection will be jeopardized, the assets of the taxpayer, and the amount of the assessment as it relates to whether jeopardy status exists. The burden of proof as to the amount of the assessment for purposes of
 determining jeopardy status is upon the taxpayer.

(b) (1) Within 60 days after the earlier of the following days, the taxpayer may appeal the determination to the State Board of Equalization in the manner provided in Section 19085:

(A) The day the Franchise Tax Board notifies the taxpayer of the determination described in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a).

(B) One day after the time period prescribed by paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) for the Franchise Tax Board to make its determination.

(2) If an appeal is not filed before the expiration of the time periods, the Franchise Tax Board’s determination is final. Filing of an appeal shall not operate to stay collection. Collection may be stayed only as provided in Section 19083.

(3) Within 60 days after an appeal is filed under paragraph (1), the board shall determine whether the issuance of notice and demand under Section 19081 or 19082 is reasonable under the circumstances. The burden of proof with respect to whether a jeopardy exists as to collection or an assessment is upon the Franchise Tax Board.

(4) If the board determines that a jeopardy status does not apply to all or part of the assessment, the board may modify the amount of the assessment to which the jeopardy attaches. If the board does not act within the time period provided in paragraph (3) as modified by paragraph (6), the board will be deemed to have denied the taxpayer’s appeal.

(5) In making the determination required by paragraph (3), the board shall consider all relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the likelihood
 that collection will be jeopardized, the assets of the taxpayer, and the amount of the assessment as it relates to whether jeopardy status exists. The burden of proof as to the amount of the assessment for purposes of determining jeopardy status is upon the taxpayer.

(6) If either party requests an extension of the 60-day period set forth in paragraph (3) and establishes reasonable grounds why the extension should be granted, the board may grant an extension of not more than 30 additional days.

(c) (1) Within 60 days after the earlier of the following days, either party may bring a civil action against the other in superior court for a judicial determination as to whether or not the issuance of the notice and demand under Section 19081 or 19082 is reasonable under the circumstances:

(A) The day
 the board notifies the taxpayer of its determination described in paragraph (3), as modified by paragraph (6), of subdivision (b).

(B) If the board fails to make a timely determination, then one day after the time prescribed for the board to make its determination.

(2) If a civil action under this subdivision is not commenced within the 60-day period set forth in paragraph (1), the board’s determination is final. The filing of the civil action shall not operate to stay collection. Collection shall be stayed only as provided by Section 19083.

(3) Within 60 days after proper service is made, the superior court shall determine whether the issuance of notice and demand under Section 19081 or 19082 is reasonable under the circumstances. The burden of proof with respect to whether a jeopardy exists as to collection or an
 assessment is upon the Franchise Tax Board.

(4) If the court determines that a jeopardy status does not apply to all or part of the assessment, the court may modify the amount of the assessment to which the jeopardy attaches.

(5) In making the determination required by paragraph (3), the superior court shall consider all relevant factors, including, but not limited to, the likelihood that collection will be jeopardized, the assets of the taxpayer, and the amount of the assessment as it relates to whether jeopardy status exists. The burden of proof as to the amount of the assessment for purposes of determining jeopardy status is upon the taxpayer.

(6) If either party in the action requests an extension of the 60-day period set forth in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) and establishes reasonable grounds why the
 extension should be granted, the superior court may grant an extension of not more than 30 additional days.

(7) Actions filed pursuant to this section shall be filed in the Superior Court of the County of Los Angeles, the City and County of San Francisco, the County of San Diego, or the County of Sacramento. Sections 19387 and 19389 shall apply to those actions.

(8) The determination made by a superior court under this section shall be final and conclusive and shall not be reviewed by any other court.

(d) The amendments made by the act adding this subdivision are operative for taxes assessed and levies made after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 931, Sec. 16.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19085.

The taxpayer may appeal to the board from the Franchise Tax Board’s action on the petition for review. The appeal shall be made in the manner prescribed by Section 19046. Article 3 (commencing with Section 19031) of Chapter 4 relating to an appeal from the action of the Franchise Tax Board on a protest against an additional tax proposed to be assessed applies to the appeal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19086.

In any proceeding brought to enforce payment of taxes made due and payable by this article, the finding of the Franchise Tax Board under Section 19081, whether made after notice to the taxpayer or not, is for all purposes presumptive evidence that the assessment or collection of the tax or the deficiency was in jeopardy. A certificate of the Franchise Tax Board of the mailing or issuing of the notices specified in this article is presumptive evidence that the notices were mailed or issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19087.

(a) If any taxpayer fails to file a return, or files a false or fraudulent return with intent to evade the tax, for any taxable year, the Franchise Tax Board, at any time, may require a return or an amended return under penalties of perjury or may make an estimate of the net income, from any available information, and may propose to assess the amount of tax, interest, and penalties due. All the provisions of this part relative to delinquent taxes shall be applicable to the tax, interest, and penalties computed
 hereunder.

(b) When any assessment is proposed under subdivision (a), the taxpayer shall have the right to protest the same and to have an oral hearing thereon if requested, and also to appeal to the board from the Franchise Tax Board’s action on the protest; the taxpayer must proceed in the manner and within the time prescribed by Sections 19041 to 19048, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19088.

(a) On the appointment of a receiver for any taxpayer in any receivership proceeding before any court of the United States or of any state or territory or of the District of Columbia, any deficiency (together with all interest, additional amounts, or additions to the tax provided for by law) determined by the Franchise Tax Board in respect
 of a tax upon the taxpayer may be immediately assessed.

(b) Any deficiency (together with all interest, additional amounts, and additions to the tax provided by law) determined by the Franchise Tax Board in respect of a tax on either of the following: (1) The debtor’s estate in a case under Title 11 of the United States Code.(2) The debtor, but only if liability for the tax has become res judicata pursuant to a determination in a case under Title 11 of the United States Code,may be immediately assessed if that deficiency has not previously been assessed in accordance with law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19089.

(a) Every trustee in a case under Title 11 of the United States Code, receiver, assignee for the benefit of creditors or like fiduciary shall give notice of qualification as such to the Franchise Tax Board in the manner and at the time that may be required by regulations of the Franchise Tax Board. The Franchise Tax Board may by regulation provide for any exemptions from the requirements of this section that the Franchise Tax Board deems proper.

(b) If the regulations
 issued pursuant to this section require the giving of any notice by any fiduciary in any case under Title 11 of the United States Code, or by a receiver in any other court proceeding to the Franchise Tax Board of qualification as such, the running of the period of limitations for mailing a notice of proposed deficiency assessment shall be suspended for the period from the date of the institution of the proceeding to a date 30 days after the date upon which the notice from the receiver or other fiduciary is received by the Franchise Tax Board; but the suspension under this section shall in no case be for a period in excess of two years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 73.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19090.

(a) Claims for the deficiency and such interest, additional amounts and additions to the tax may be presented, for adjudication in accordance with law, to the court before which the receivership proceeding (or case under Title 11 of the United States Code) is pending, despite the pendency of an appeal to the board.

(b) In the case of a receivership proceeding, no appeal shall be filed with the board after the appointment of the
 receiver.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19091.

Upon notice and demand from the Franchise Tax Board after termination of the receivership proceeding, the taxpayer shall pay any portion of the claim allowed in the proceeding which is unpaid. The unpaid amount may be collected in the manner provided in this part for the collection of delinquent taxes at any time within six years after termination of the proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19092.

The Franchise Tax Board may prescribe rules and regulations necessary to properly carry out this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19093.

(a) If the individual who is in physical possession of cash in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) does not claim that cash in any of the capacities specified in paragraphs (1) and (2), then for purposes of Sections 19081 and 19082, it shall be presumed that the cash represents gross income of a single individual for the taxable year in which the possession occurs, and that the collection of tax will be jeopardized by delay:

(1) The cash is
 not claimed as his or hers.

(2) The cash is not claimed as belonging to another person whose identity the Franchise Tax Board can readily ascertain and who acknowledges ownership of that cash.

(b) In the case of any assessment resulting from the application of subdivision (a), all of the following apply:

(1) The entire amount of the cash shall be treated as taxable income for the taxable year in which the possession occurs.

(2) That income shall be treated as taxable at the maximum rate under Section 17041.

(3) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the possessor of the cash shall be treated (solely with respect to that cash) as the taxpayer for purposes of Chapter 4 (commencing with
 Section 19001) and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 19201).

(c) If, after an assessment resulting from the application of subdivision (a), that assessment is abated and replaced by an assessment against the owner of the cash, that later assessment shall be treated for purposes of all laws relating to lien, levy, and collection as relating back to the date of the original assessment.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Cash” includes any cash equivalent.

(2) “Cash equivalent” means any of the following:

(A) Foreign currency.

(B) Any bearer obligation.

(C) Any medium of exchange to which both of the following apply:

(i) It is of a type which has been frequently used in illegal activities.

(ii) It is specified as a cash equivalent for purposes of this part in regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(3) Any cash equivalent shall be taken into account in the following manner:

(A) In the case of a bearer obligation, at its face amount.

(B) In the case of any other cash equivalent, at its fair market value.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Interest [19101. - 19120.]

19101.

(a) If any amount of tax imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), is not paid on or before the last date prescribed for payment, interest on that amount at the adjusted annual rate established under Section 19521 shall be paid for the period from that last date to the date paid.

(b) For purposes of this article, the last date prescribed for payment of the tax shall be determined under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section
 19001), with the application of the following rules:

(1) The last date prescribed for payment shall be determined without regard to any extension of time for payment or any installment agreement entered into under Section 19008.

(2) The last date prescribed for payment shall be determined without regard to any notice and demand for payment issued, by reason of jeopardy as provided in Article 5 (commencing with Section 19081), prior to the last date otherwise prescribed for that payment.

(3) In all other cases in which the last date for payment is not otherwise prescribed, the last date for payment shall be deemed to be the date the liability for tax arises (and in no event shall be later than the date notice and demand for the tax is made by the Franchise Tax Board).

(c) Except as provided in this article:

(1) Interest prescribed under this article on any tax shall be paid upon notice and demand, and shall be assessed, collected, and paid in the same manner as taxes. Any reference in Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part (except Article 3 (commencing with Section 19031), relating to deficiency assessments) to any tax imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) shall be deemed also to refer to interest imposed by this article on that tax.

(2) (A) Interest shall be imposed under subdivision (a) in respect to any assessable penalty, additional amount, or addition to the tax (other than an addition to tax imposed under Section 19131, 19132, or 19164) only if that
 assessable penalty, additional amount, or addition to the tax is not paid within 15 calendar days from the date of notice and demand therefor, and in that case interest shall be imposed only for the period from the date of the notice and demand to the date of payment.

(B) Interest shall be imposed under this article with respect to any addition to tax imposed by Section 19131 (relating to failure to file a return on or before the due date), Section 19132 (relating to underpayment of tax), or Section 19164 (relating to imposition of the accuracy-related penalty), for the period that:

(i) Begins on the date on which the return of the tax with respect to which that addition to tax is imposed is required to be filed (including any extensions), and

(ii) Ends on the date of payment of that addition to tax.

(3) If notice and demand is made for payment of any amount and if that amount is paid within 15 calendar days after the date of the notice and demand, interest under this article on the amount so paid shall not be imposed for the period after the date of the notice and demand.

(d) This article shall not apply to any failure to pay estimated tax required by Section 19025 or 19136.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 863, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19104.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board may abate all or any part of any of the following:

(1) Any interest on a deficiency or related to a proposed deficiency to the extent that interest is attributable in whole or in part to any unreasonable error or delay by an officer or employee of the Franchise Tax Board (acting in his or her official capacity) in performing a ministerial or managerial act.

(2) Any interest on a
 payment of any tax described in Section 19033 to the extent that any delay in that payment is attributable to an officer or employee of the Franchise Tax Board (acting in his or her official capacity) being dilatory in performing a ministerial or managerial act.
